Nevada, session 83, SB145.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee the sum of
$12,500,000 for allocation to the City of Reno for the restoration
and refurbishment of the Lear Theater in Reno, Nevada, including,
without limitation, any necessary repairs to meet the requirements of
any applicable building, fire, health and safety codes.
2. Allocation of the money appropriated by subsection 1 is
contingent upon matching money being obtained by the City of
Reno, including, without limitation, gifts, grants and donations to
the City of Reno from private and public sources of money other
than the appropriation made by subsection 1. The Interim Finance
Committee shall not direct the transfer of any portion of money
from the appropriation made by subsection 1 until the City Manager
of the City of Reno submits to the Committee proof satisfactory to
the Committee that matching money in an equivalent amount has
been committed.
-
*SB145*

– 2 –
3. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
the City Manager of the City of Reno agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the City of Reno
through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the City of Reno
through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of the City of Reno, regardless of their form or location,
that the Legislative Auditor deems necessary to conduct an audit of
the use of the money appropriated by subsection 1.
4. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB145*